Connecticut, session 2026, HB05165.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section, "a hospital
in financial distress or operational crisis" means a hospital that (1) has
filed for bankruptcy protection, or (2) is experiencing three or more of
the following conditions: (A) The hospital has been issued a negative
going concern opinion by its independent auditing firm; (B) the hospital
owes fees, taxes or an assessment to one or more public entities and such
fees or taxes are, or such assessment is, not less than one hundred eighty
days past due, provided the hospital has not (i) commenced a
proceeding to contest the payment of such fees, taxes or assessment, or
(ii) been granted an extension of time to pay such fees, taxes or
assessment; (C) the hospital is in default of a material covenant on a
bond contract or similar debt instrument; (D) the hospital has failed to
make a payment of wages, as defined in section 31-71a of the general
statutes, for two or more consecutive pay periods, provided the amount
of such wages is not in dispute pursuant to section 31-71d of the general
statutes; or (E) the Commissioner of Public Health has revoked the
hospital's license or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services has
revoked the hospital's participating provider status.

House Bill No. 5165
(b) The Commissioner of Public Health shall evaluate whether the
Attorney General should be authorized to petition the Superior Court
for the appointment of a receiver to manage a hospital in financial
distress or operational crisis. Not later than October 1, 2027, the
commissioner shall report, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
health regarding such evaluation.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-29 2 of 2